Oklahoma, session 2026, SB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 50-136.10 of Title 11, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any


person receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Police Pension and


Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, and who continues to receive


benefits on or after the effective date of this act, shall receive a


five percent (5%) increase in benefits.


B. For any member of the System who joined prior to January 1,


1981, who shall have his or her pension increased or decreased by


one-third (1/3) of any increase or decrease to the base salary of a


regular police officer, any increase in benefits a person is



Req. No. 108 Page 1

RBS No. 108

eligible to receive after July 1, 2020, shall be offset by the


increase in benefits, if any, provided by this section.




60-1-108 RD 12/6/2024 9:57:36 AM









































Req. No. 108 Page 2